District of Columbia statutes.
38-2555

Memorandum of Understanding.

(a)

The voting members of the Task Force shall adopt and sign a Memorandum of Understanding regarding the implementation of the Reform Plan, which shall be submitted to the Council.

(b)

This chapter shall expire upon the submission of the Memorandum of Understanding to the Council pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 376, 50 DCR 5668
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6 of Special Education Task Force Establishment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-232, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10729).